en: Firework assortment types included: Aerial repeaters (cakes); Bottle rockets; Firecrackers; Fountains; Ground spinners; Mortars and shells; Novelty fireworks; Parachutes; Poppers; Reloadable tubes and launchers; Roman candles; Smoke fireworks; Snakes; Sparklers; Whistles; Other
es: Tipos de fuegos artificiales de surtido incluidos: Repetidores aéreos (baterías); Cohetes de botella; Petardos; Fuentes; Trompos de suelo; Morteros y carcasas; Fuegos artificiales de novedad; Paracaídas; Bombetas; Tubos y lanzadores recargables; Candelas romanas; Fuegos artificiales de humo; Serpientes; Luces de bengala; Silbatos; Otro
zh-CN: 所含烟花品种类型: 升空连发烟花（盆花）; 窜天猴; 鞭炮; 喷泉烟花; 地面旋转烟花; 发射管和礼花弹; 新奇烟花; 降落伞烟花; 摔炮; 可重装发射管和发射器; 罗马烛光烟花; 烟雾弹; 蛇形烟花; 仙女棒; 哨音烟花; 其他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται είδη συλλογής πυροτεχνημάτων: Εναέριες συστοιχίες (cakes); Ρουκέτες (bottle rockets); Κροτίδες; Σιντριβάνια; Περιστρεφόμενα εδάφους (spinners); Όλμοι και βλήματα; Πυροτεχνήματα novelty; Αλεξίπτωτα; Δυναμιτάκια (poppers); Επαναγεμιζόμενοι σωλήνες και εκτοξευτές; Ρωμαϊκά κεριά; Καπνογόνα; Φιδάκια; Βεγγαλικά; Σφυρίχτρες; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vključene vrste ognjemetov: Baterije (ognjemet); Rakete z ravnimi palicami; Petarde; Fontane; Talne vrtavke; Možnarji in bombe; Razvedrilna pirotehnika; Padala; Pokalice; Cevi in izstreljevalci za ponovno polnjenje; Rimske sveče; Dimni izdelki; Kače; Kresničke; Žvižgači; Drugo
hu: Mellékelt tűzijáték választék típusai: Légi ismétlők (telepek); Pálcás rakéták; Petárdák; Szökőkutak; Földi forgók; Mozsarak és bombák; Különleges tűzijátékok; Ejtőernyősök; Durranók; Újratölthető vetőcsövek és indítók; Rómaigyertyák; Füstképző tűzijátékok; Kígyók; Csillagszórók; Süvöltők; Egyéb
hr-HR: Uključene vrste asortimana vatrometa: Vatrometne baterije; Male rakete; Petarde; Fontane; Zvrkovi; Mužari i bombe; Zabavni vatromet; Padobrani; Pucavci; Cijevi za ponovno punjenje i lanseri; Rimske svijeće; Dimne bombe; Zmijice; Prskalice; Zviždaljke; Ostalo
sv: Ingående fyrverkerityper: Fyrverkeritårtor; Flaskraketer; Smällare; Fontäner; Marksnurror; Mörsare och bomber; Leksaksfyrverkerier; Fallskärmar; Party-poppers; Omladdningsbara rör och avfyrningsramper; Romerska ljus; Rökfyrverkerier; Ormar; Tomtebloss; Tjutare; Övrigt
ru: Типы фейерверков в комплекте: Батареи салютов; Ракеты; Петарды; Фонтаны; Наземные вертушки; Мортиры и снаряды; Развлекательная пиротехника; Парашюты; Хлопушки; Многозарядные трубы и пусковые установки; Римские свечи; Дымовые шашки; Змейки; Бенгальские огни; Свистки; Другое
pt-PT: tipos de variedade de fogos de artifício incluídos: Repetidores aéreos (baterias); Foguetes de garrafa; Petardos; Fontes; Piões de solo; Morteiros e bombas; Artigos pirotécnicos recreativos; Paraquedas; Estalos; Tubos e lançadores recarregáveis; Velas romanas; Fogo de artifício de fumo; Cobras; Estrelinhas; Assobios; Outro
pl: W zestawie rodzaje asortymentu fajerwerków: Wyrzutnie; Małe rakiety; Petardy; Fontanny; Bączki; Moździerze i kule; Fajerwerki galanteryjne; Spadochrony; Zabawki strzelające; Moździerze wielokrotnego użytku; Rzymskie ognie; Świece dymne; Węże faraona; Zimne ognie; Gwizdki; Inne
ja: 花火アソートメントタイプ付き: 連発花火; ロケット花火; 爆竹; 噴出花火; 回転花火; 打ち上げ花火 (打上筒と玉); おもちゃ花火; パラシュート花火; クラッカー; 詰め替え可能な打上筒; ローマンキャンドル; 煙幕花火; ヘビ玉; スパークラー; 笛花火; その他
lt-LT: Įtraukti fejerverkų rinkinio tipai: Daugiašūvės baterijos (fejerverkų tortai); Butelinės raketos; Petardos; Fontanai; Žemės suktukai; Mortyros ir užtaisai; Smulkūs fejerverkai; Parašiutai; Pokštukai; Pakartotinai užtaisomi vamzdžiai ir paleidikliai; Romėniškos žvakės; Dūminiai fejerverkai; Gyvatėlės; Šaltosios ugnelės; Švilpukai; Kita
da: Fyrværkerisortiment, der er inkluderet: Luftbatterier; Raketter; Knaldfyrværkeri; Fontæner; Jordsole; Morterer og bomber; Spøgefyrværkeri; Faldskærme; Knaldperler; Genopfyldelige rør og affyringsramper; Romerlys; Røgfyrværkeri; Faraos slanger; Stjernekastere; Heksehyl; Andet
sk-SK: Zahrnuté typy pyrotechniky: Vzdušné opakovače (kompakty); Malé rakety; Petardy; Fontány; Pozemné rotory; Mažiare a guľové pumy; Zábavná pyrotechnika; Padáčiky; Práskačky; Znovu nabíjateľné rúrky a odpaľovače; Rímske sviece; Dymovnice; Hady; Prskavky; Píšťalky; Iné
de: Enthaltene Arten von Feuerwerkskörpern: Feuerwerksbatterien (Cakes); Flaschenraketen; Böller; Fontänen; Bodenwirbel; Mörser und Kugelbomben; Scherzfeuerwerk; Fallschirmraketen; Knallerbsen; Wiederbeladbare Rohre und Abschussgeräte; Römische Lichter; Rauchkörper; Pharaoschlangen; Wunderkerzen; Heuler; Sonstige
vi: Các loại pháo hoa đi kèm: Pháo hoa phụt nổ liên hoàn (giàn); Pháo thăng thiên; Pháo nổ; Pháo sáng dạng đài phun; Pháo xoay mặt đất; Pháo cối và đạn pháo; Pháo hoa tạo hình độc lạ; Pháo dù; Pháo giấy; Ống phóng và bệ phóng có thể nạp lại; Pháo hoa Roman candle; Pháo khói; Pháo rắn; Pháo bông; Pháo rít; Khác
nb: Fyrverkeriutvalg inkludert: Luftbatterier; Pinneraketter; Kinaputter; Fontener; Bakkespinnere; Mortere og granater; Småfyrverkeri; Fallskjermer; Party-poppers; Gjenbrukbare rør og utskytere; Romerske lys; Røykfyrverkeri; Faraoslanger; Stjerneskudd; Hylere; Annet
fi: Mukana toimitetut ilotulitevalikoimat: Ilmassa toistuvat (ilotulitepadat); Pulloraketit; Sähikäiset; Suihkut; Hyrrät; Mörssärit ja pommit; Erikoisilotulitteet; Laskuvarjot; Paukut; Uudelleenladattavat putket ja laukaisimet; Roomalaiset kynttilät; Savutulitteet; Savukäärmeet; Tähtisadetikut; Vihellystulitteet; Muu
tr: Havai fişek setine dahil olan havai fişek türleri: Havada tekrarlayanlar (batarya); Şişe roketleri; Çatapatlar; Volkanlar; Yer fırıldakları; Havan ve mermiler; Eğlencelik havai fişekler; Paraşütler; Patlayan şekerler; Yeniden doldurulabilir tüpler ve fırlatıcılar; Roma kandilleri; Sis havai fişekleri; Yılanlar; Maytaplar; Islıklar; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipos de conjuntos de fogos de artifício incluídos: Repetidores aéreos (baterias); Foguetes de garrafa; Bombinhas; Fontes; Piões de solo; Morteiros e bombas; Fogos de artifício lúdicos; Paraquedas; Estalos; Tubos e lançadores recarregáveis; Velas romanas; Fogos de artifício de fumaça; Cobrinhas; Velas estrela; Apitos; Outros
cs: Typy zábavní pyrotechniky, které jsou součástí balení: Kompaktní ohňostroje (baterie); Rakety s tyčkou; Petardy; Fontány; Pozemní rotující pyrotechnika; Hmoždíře a kulové pumy; Dětská pyrotechnika; Padáčky; Práskací kuličky a provázky; Znovuplnitelné tubusy a odpalovače; Římské svíce; Dýmovnice; Faraonovi hadi; Prskavky; Hvízdavé efekty; Jiné
zh-TW: 煙火組合內含類型: 升空連發煙火 (盆花); 沖天炮; 鞭炮; 噴花煙火; 地面旋轉煙火; 發射管與煙火彈; 造型煙火; 降落傘煙火; 拉炮; 可重複裝填發射管與發射器; 羅馬蠟燭煙火; 煙霧煙火; 蛇形煙火; 仙女棒; 笛音煙火; 其他
nl: Vuurwerkassortiment inbegrepen typen: Vuurwerkbatterijen (cakes); Flespijlen; Rotjes; Fonteinen; Grondtollen; Mortieren en shells; Fop- en schertsvuurwerk; Parachutes; Poppers; Hervulbare buizen en lanceerders; Romeinse kaarsen; Rookvuurwerk; Vuurwerkslangen; Sterretjes; Fluiters; Overige
th: ประเภทของดอกไม้ไฟคละแบบที่รวมอยู่: พลุต่อเนื่อง (พลุเค้ก); พลุจรวดขวด; ประทัด; พลุน้ำพุ; พลุหมุนพื้น; พลุท่อและกระสุนพลุ; พลุของเล่น; พลุร่มชูชีพ; พลุดึง/พลุป๊อปเปอร์; ท่อยิงแบบเติมได้และเครื่องยิง; พลุโรมันแคนเดิล; พลุควัน; พลุงู; ไฟเย็น; พลุเสียงหวีด; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipuri de sortimente de artificii incluse: Repetoare aeriene (baterii); Rachete cu băț; Petarde; Fântâni (vulcani); Sori rotitori de sol; Mortiere și bombe; Artificii de noutate; Parașute; Pocnitori; Tuburi și lansatoare reîncărcabile; Lumânări romane; Artificii cu fum; Șerpi (artificii); Steluțe (artificii de mână); Șuierători; Altele
ko: 불꽃놀이 세트 포함 유형: 공중 연속 발사기(케이크); 병 로켓; 폭죽; 분수 폭죽; 지상 스피너; 박격포 및 쉘; 이색 폭죽; 낙하산; 파퍼; 재장전 튜브 및 런처; 로만 캔들; 연막 폭죽; 스네이크; 스파클러; 휘슬; 기타
fr: Types de feux d’artifice inclus dans l’assortiment: Répéteurs aériens (compacts); Fusées de bouteille; Pétards; Fontaines; Toupies terrestres; Mortiers et bombes; Artifices fantaisie; Parachutes; Claque-doigts; Tubes rechargeables et lanceurs; Chandelles romaines; Artifices fumigènes; Serpents de pharaon; Cierges magiques; Sifflets; Autre
it: Tipi di assortimento di fuochi d'artificio inclusi: Ripetitori aerei (batterie); Razzi a bottiglia; Petardi; Fontane; Girelle a terra; Mortai e sfere; Articoli pirotecnici da divertimento; Paracadute; Popper; Tubi e lanciatori ricaricabili; Candele romane; Fumogeni; Serpenti del faraone; Stelline scintillanti; Fischianti; Altro
bg-BG: Включени типове фойерверки: Пиротехнически батерии (торти); Ракети; Пиратки; Фонтани; Наземни пумпали; Мортири и снаряди; Нестандартни фойерверки; Парашути; Пиратки; Презареждаеми тръби и изстрелвачки; Римски свещи; Димки; Змийчета; Бенгалски огън; Свирки; Други